Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF97.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0625, subdivision 8e, is amended to read: Subd. 8e. Chiropractic services. deleted text begin Payment fordeleted text end new text begin (a) Medical assistance coversnew text end chiropractic services deleted text begin isdeleted text end new text begin and related services recommended by a health care professional: (1) licensed to perform such services; and (2) using generally accepted chiropractic standards of care. Covered services include but are not limited to medical evaluation and management services, manual therapy, spinal manipulation, and therapeutic exercises to treat acute spinal pain, chronic spinal pain, and neuromusculoskeletal conditions related to the spine.new text end new text begin (b) Services covered under this subdivision, other than x-rays, arenew text end limited to deleted text begin one annual evaluation anddeleted text end 24 visits per year unless prior authorization of a greater number of visits is obtained.new text begin Coverage for x-rays is limited to radiological examinations:new text end new text begin (1) of the full spine; the cervical, thoracic, lumbar, and lumbosacral areas of the spine; the pelvis; or the sacroiliac joints; and new text end new text begin (2) necessary to support a diagnosis of subluxation. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256L.03, subdivision 3b, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-01086 256L.03 COVERED HEALTH SERVICES. Subd. 3b. Chiropractic services. MinnesotaCare covers the following chiropractic services: medically necessary exams, manual manipulation of the spine, and x-rays.